Utah statutes.
19-6-602.   Lead acid batteries -- Disposal limitations.

(1)  A person may not place, discard, or otherwise dispose of a lead acid battery in any solid waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility operated by a municipality, county, other political subdivision, or other entity. All lead acid batteries shall be disposed of by delivery to:

(a)  a lead acid battery retailer as provided in Section 19-6-603;

(b)  a lead acid battery wholesaler;

(c)  a collection or recycling facility; or

(d)  a secondary lead smelter that meets state and federal permit requirements.

(2) (a)  Lead acid batteries shall be removed from vehicles prior to crushing or shredding.

(b)  The removed lead acid batteries shall be disposed of in accordance with this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session 

Enacted by Chapter 122, 1991 General Session

